Alaska statutes. Title 36. Public Contracts.
Chapter 05. Wages and Hours of Labor.

Cross references. —

For provision prescribing the applicability of the 2011 amendments of this chapter to contracts entered into on or after October 21, 2011, see § 8, ch. 28, SLA 2011, in the 2011 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For wages and hours, see 8 AAC 30, art. 1.

For wage scale, see 8 AAC 30, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Little Davis-Bacon Act does not apply to construction contracts awarded under the weatherization program.
Apr. 18, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The phrase “telecommunications work” can encompass a variety of activities.
If the work involves a permanent improvement to property, the requirement to pay prevailing wages in this chapter should apply.
May 5, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Alaska’s Little Davis-Bacon Act, is not applicable to a contract awarded by the Department of Environmental Conservation for fuel contamination clean-up work at a service station where such work is not tied to an otherwise identifiable public construction project.
Mar. 14, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Little Davis-Bacon Act applies to a hotel being constructed by “Inn-Vestments Associates of Alaska,” a partnership in which the Alaska Railroad Corporation holds a 40% interest. Jan. 1, 1993 Op. Att’y Gen.